Maryland, session 2026, HB1244.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
12–104.
(H) (1) THE OWNER OF PROPERTY THAT IS USED FOR RESIDENTIAL
PURPOSES MAY BRING AN ACTION IN A COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION FOR
DAMAGES INCURRED AS THE RESULT OF THE VALUE OF THAT PROPERTY BEING
DIMINISHED BY THE TAKING OF ANOTHER PROPERTY IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
SUBTITLE IF THE PROPERTY BEING TAKEN:
(I) IS LOCATED WITHIN 300 FEET OF THE OWNER’S RESIDENCE;
AND
(II) WAS TAKEN IN CONJUNCTION WITH THE CONSTRUCTION OF
AN OVERHEAD TRANSMISSION LINE OR RELATED INFRASTRUCTURE.
(2) A PROPERTY OWNER WHO BRINGS AN ACTION UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION AND IS AWARDED DAMAGES MAY ALSO SEEK, AND THE COURT MAY
AWARD, REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES.
(3) A PROPERTY OWNER MAY BRING AN ACTION UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1) OF THIS SUBSECTION ON THE ENTERING OF THE FINAL DECISION IN A
CONDEMNATION PROCEEDING.
12–105.
(b) (1) (I) The fair market value of property in a condemnation proceeding
is the price as of the valuation date for the highest and best use of the property which a
vendor, willing but not obligated to sell, would accept for the property, and which a
purchaser, willing but not obligated to buy, would pay, excluding any increment in value
proximately caused by the public project for which the property condemned is needed. [In
addition, fair]
(II) FAIR market value includes any amount by which the price
reflects a diminution in value occurring between the effective date of legislative authority
for the acquisition of the property and the date of actual taking if the trier of facts finds
that the diminution in value was proximately caused by the public project for which the
property condemned is needed, or by announcements or acts of the plaintiff or its officials
concerning the public project, and was beyond the reasonable control of the property owner.

HOUSE BILL 1244 3
(2) (I) THIS PARAGRAPH APPLIES ONLY TO A CONDEMNATION
PROCEEDING RELATED TO THE CONSTRUCTION OF AN OVERHEAD TRANSMISSION
LINE IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–207 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE.
(II) IF THE FINAL DECISION IN A CONDEMNATION PROCEEDING
IS THAT THE ASSESSED VALUE OF THE PROPERTY IS GREATER THAN THE APPRAISED
VALUE PLACED ON THE PROPERTY BY THE CONDEMNING AUTHORITY, A
REASONABLE COUNSEL FEE FIXED BY THE TRIAL COURT SHALL BE AWARDED TO
COUNSEL FOR THE DEFENDANT AND CHARGED AGAINST THE PLAINTIFF TOGETHER
WITH THE OTHER COSTS OF THE CASE.
12–107.
(a) Any party to a condemnation case may appeal from a final judgment or
determination in the manner prescribed by the Maryland Rules.
(b) (1) If the final decision on appeal is that the plaintiff is not entitled to
condemn the property, a reasonable counsel fee fixed by the trial court shall be awarded to
counsel for the defendant and charged against the plaintiff together with the other costs of
the case.
(2) (I) THIS PARAGRAPH APPLIES ONLY TO THE APPEAL OF A
CONDEMNATION CASE RELATED TO THE CONSTRUCTION OF AN OVERHEAD
TRANSMISSION LINE IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–207 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES
ARTICLE.
(II) IF THE FINAL DECISION ON APPEAL IS THAT THE ASSESSED
VALUE OF THE PROPERTY IS GREATER THAN THE APPRAISED VALUE PLACED ON THE
PROPERTY BY THE CONDEMNING AUTHORITY, A REASONABLE COUNSEL FEE FIXED
BY THE TRIAL COURT SHALL BE AWARDED TO COUNSEL FOR THE DEFENDANT AND
CHARGED AGAINST THE PLAINTIFF TOGETHER WITH THE OTHER COSTS OF THE
CASE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.